District of Columbia statutes.
47-317.08

Repealed

Compliance and Real Property Tax Administration Fund.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1072(b), 52 DCR 7503
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9015, 58 DCR 6226
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1072(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Short title of subtitle N of title I of Law 16-33: Section 1071 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle M of title I of the act may be cited as the Establishment of Compliance and Real Property Tax Administration Fund Act of 2005.